Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2139.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5722 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 5722. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cell-cultured protein." A product made for human consumption that is:(1) made wholly or in part from the cell culture or the DNA of any animal, including any mammal, reptile, fish, amphibian, bird or invertebrate; and(2) grown or cultivated outside of the animal from which 1234567891011121314151617 the cell culture or DNA was acquired.* * *Section 2. Section 5723 of Title 3 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 5723. Prohibited acts.The following acts are prohibited:* * *(15) The manufacturing, selling, delivering for sale, holding for sale or offering for sale of cell-cultured protein.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2139PN2764 - 2 - 1234567891011